Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 78.
[CITY AND COUNTY GOVERNMENT REDEVELOPMENT]

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by H.J.R. 1012 during the 1999 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2000 general election by a vote of 427,407 for and 355,943 against.

This amendment was designated as Amendment 78 by the Secretary of State, and was known as Amendment No. 1 on the general election ballot for 2000:

“The City and County Government Redevelopment Bond and Short Term Financing Amendment.” The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 78, § 4: Jan. 1, 2001.

§ 1. Redevelopment Projects.

Any city or county may form a redevelopment district for the purpose of financing one (1) or more redevelopment projects within the district.

A city or county which has formed a redevelopment district may issue bonds for the purpose of financing capital improvements for redevelopment projects within the district. The bonds may be secured by and be payable from all or a portion of the division of ad valorem taxes in the district provided for in (d) below. The bonds shall not be considered in calculating debt limits for bonds issued pursuant to Article XII, Section 4, of the Arkansas Constitution and shall not be subject to the provisions of Article XVI, Section 1 of the Arkansas Constitution or Amendments 62 or 65 to the Arkansas Constitution.

For purposes of this section, the term “redevelopment project” means an undertaking for eliminating, or preventing the development or spread of, slums or blighted, deteriorated, or deteriorating areas, for discouraging the loss of commerce, industry, or employment, or for increasing employment, or any combination thereof, as may be defined by the General Assembly.

The General Assembly may provide that the ad valorem taxes levied by any taxing unit, in which is located all or part of an area included in a redevelopment district, may be divided so that all or part of the ad valorem taxes levied against any increase in the assessed value of property in the area obtaining after the effective date of the ordinance approving the redevelopment plan for the district shall be used to pay any indebtedness incurred for the redevelopment project; provided, however, there shall be excluded from the division all ad valorem taxes for debt service approved by voters in a taxing unit prior to the effective date of this amendment.

After the effective date of an ordinance approving the redevelopment plan for the district, no increase in the assessed value of property in a redevelopment district shall be taken into account for purposes of calculating increases in the aggregate value of taxable real and personal property in a taxing unit pursuant to Article XVI, Section 14 of the Arkansas Constitution.

Any provision of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas in conflict with this section is repealed insofar as it is in conflict with this amendment.

The General Assembly shall provide for the implementation of this section by law.

§ 2. [Short-term financing obligations].

For the purpose of acquiring, constructing, installing or renting real property or tangible personal property having an expected useful life of more than one (1) year, municipalities and counties may incur short-term financing obligations maturing over a period of, or having a term, not to exceed five (5) years. Such obligations may bear interest. The aggregate principal amount of short-term financing obligations incurred by a municipality or a county pursuant to this section shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the assessed value of taxable property located within the municipality or two and one half percent (2.5%) of the assessed value of taxable property located within the county, as determined by the last tax assessment completed before the last obligation was incurred by the city or county. The total annual principal and interest payments in each fiscal year on all outstanding obligations of a municipality or a county pursuant to this section shall be charged against and paid from the general revenues for such fiscal year, which may include road fund revenues. Tax revenues earmarked for solid waste disposal purposes may be used to pay printing and other costs associated with bonds issued under this amendment for solid waste disposal purposes.

As used here:

“Short-term financing obligation” means a debt, a note, an installment purchase agreement, a lease, a lease-purchase contract, or any other similar agreement, whether secured or unsecured; provided, that the obligation shall mature over a period of, or have a term, not to exceed five (5) years.

Repealed.

The provisions of this section shall be self-executing. [As amended by Const. Amend. 89, § 14.]

Publisher's Notes.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.

Ark. Const. Amend. 89, § 14 amended this section effective January 1, 2011. Amendment 89 was proposed by H.J.R. 1004 during the 2009 Regular Session and adopted at the 2010 general election by a vote of 448,711 for and 250,167 against.

Before amendment, this section read:

“(a)

For the purpose of acquiring, constructing, installing or renting real property or tangible personal property having an expected useful life of more than one (1) year, municipalities and counties may incur short-term financing obligations maturing over a period of, or having a term, not to exceed five (5) years. Such obligations may bear interest at either:

“(1)

a fixed rate throughout the term thereof, including a fixed interest rate which is to be determined by reference to an index or other formula, but not to exceed the maximum lawful rate of interest for fixed rate obligations, or

“(2)

a rate which may vary at such times and under such circumstances as the parties may agree, whether or not the interest rate in fact varies, but not to exceed the maximum lawful rate of interest for variable rate obligations. The maximum lawful rate of interest for fixed rate obligations is the formula rate in effect on the date the obligation is incurred, regardless of when such interest is to begin to accrue. The maximum lawful rate of interest for variable rate obligations is the formula rate in effect on the date such interest accrues. The aggregate principal amount of short-term financing obligations incurred by a municipality or a county pursuant to this section shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the assessed value of taxable property located within the municipality or two and one half percent (2.5%) of the assessed value of taxable property located within the county, as determined by the last tax assessment completed before the last obligation was incurred by the city or county. The total annual principal and interest payments in each fiscal year on all outstanding obligations of a municipality or a county pursuant to this section shall be charged against and paid from the general revenues for such fiscal year, which may include road fund revenues. Tax revenues earmarked for solid waste disposal purposes may be used to pay printing and other costs associated with bonds issued under this amendment for solid waste disposal purposes.

“(b)

As used here:

“(1)

‘Short-term financing obligation’ means a debt, a note, an installment purchase agreement, a lease, a lease-purchase contract, or any other similar agreement, whether secured or unsecured; provided, that the obligation shall mature over a period of, or have a term, not to exceed five (5) years;

“(2)

‘Formula rate’ means that rate of interest which is five percentage points (5%) above the equivalent bond yield of one year United States Treasury Bills offered by the United States Treasury at the last auction during the immediately preceding calendar quarter, calculated by rounding up to the nearest one-fourth of one percentage point (0.25%) (unless the equivalent bond yield is already by a multiple of one-fourth of one percentage point), and announced by the State Bank Commissioner (or such successor official who may be performing substantially the same duties) from information available from the Federal Reserve System of the United States. The calculation of the formula rate shall be made on or before the tenth (10th) day of each calendar quarter. The formula rate so calculated shall be effective on the eleventh (11th) day of the calendar quarter and shall continue in effect until the formula rate for the succeeding calendar quarter shall have been calculated and becomes effective. If, for any reason, the United States ceases to issue one year Treasury Bills, such calculation shall be made using a debt instrument of the United States having substantially the same general character and maturity. The calculation and announcement of the formula rate by the State Bank Commissioner shall be final.

“(c)

The provisions of this section shall be self-executing.”

§ 3. [Scope of authority to incur debt].

The authority conferred by this amendment shall be in addition to the authority of municipalities and counties to issue bonds and other debt obligations pursuant to Amendments 62, 65, and 72, and other provisions of the Constitution and laws of the state.

Publisher's Notes.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.